Nevada, session 83, AB383.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The State Board may adopt regulations establishing the criteria
that a vendor that provides a high-impact tutoring program must
satisfy to contract with the board of trustees of a school district or
the governing body of a charter school to provide such a program.
The regulations adopted pursuant to this subsection must establish
criteria, consistent with evidence-based best practices for high-
impact tutoring, concerning:
1. The frequency of interactions between a pupil and a tutor
under the program.
2. The standards used by the program to determine which
pupils will be selected to receive tutoring under the program.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
3. The methods of tutoring under the program, including,
without limitation, a maximum pupil-tutor ratio for the program.
4. The qualifications of a person to serve as a tutor under the
program, including, without limitation, the training necessary for
a person to serve as a tutor.
5. The instructional materials used by the program.
6. The data required to be collected by the program to
monitor the academic progress of pupils who are provided tutoring
under the program and a requirement to report the academic
progress of each pupil to:
(a) Administrators and teachers at the school in which the
pupil is enrolled; and
(b) The parent or legal guardian of the pupil.
7. The methods used by the program to ensure the security
and privacy of data concerning pupils who are provided tutoring
under the program, which must be consistent with relevant state
and federal privacy laws, including, without limitation, the Family
Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)